Missouri, session 2026, HB1978.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 338.710, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 338.710, to read as follows:
338.710. 1. There is hereby created in the Missouri board of pharmacy the "RX Cares
for Missouri Program". The goal of the program shall be to promote medication safety and to
prevent prescription drug abuse, misuse, and diversion in Missouri.
2. The board, in consultation with the department, shall be authorized to expend,
allocate, or award funds appropriated to the board to private or public entities to develop or
provide programs or education to promote medication safety or to suppress or prevent
prescription drug abuse, misuse, and diversion in the state of Missouri. In no case shall the
authorization include, nor the funds be expended for, any state prescription drug monitoring
program including, but not limited to, such as are defined in 38 CFR 1.515. Funds disbursed
to a state agency under this section may enhance, but shall not supplant, funds otherwise
appropriated to such state agency.
3. The board shall be the administrative agency responsible for implementing the
program in consultation with the department. The board and the department may enter into
interagency agreements between themselves to allow the department to assist in the
management or operation of the program. The board may award funds directly to the
department to implement, manage, develop, or provide programs or education pursuant to the
program.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1978 2
4. After a full year of program operation, the board shall prepare and submit an
evaluation report to the governor and the general assembly describing the operation of the
program and the funds allocated. [Unless otherwise authorized by the general assembly, the
program shall expire on August 28, 2026.]
✔